Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-1107
Unlawful employment practice controlling apprenticeship or training programs.

It shall be an unlawful employment practice for any employer, labor organization, or joint labor-management committee controlling apprenticeship or other training or retraining, including on-the-job training programs, to discriminate against any individual because of race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital status, national origin, or military or veteran status, in admission to, or employment in, any program established to provide apprenticeship or other training.

Laws 1965, c. 276, § 7, p. 786;

Laws 1973, LB 266, § 6;

Laws 1977, LB 161, § 5;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 82.